Idaho, session 2025, H0199.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 5, Title 56, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5
REFUGEE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACT
56-501. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Refugee Medical Assistance Act."
56-502. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, unless the context oth-
erwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(2) "Federal poverty guidelines" or "FPG" means federal poverty guide-
lines issued annually by the department of health and human services.
(3) "I-94" means an alien identification card issued to refugees prior
to their release to a sponsor.
(4) "Refugee medical assistance program" means services funded by 42
U.S.C. 1396 and 1397 as contingent upon federal funding and state spending
authority.
56-503. ELIGIBILITY. (1) A person has refugee status for purposes of
assistance under the refugee medical assistance program if such person:
(a) Has an I-94 indicating that such person has been:
(i) Paroled under 8 U.S.C. 1182;
(ii) Admitted as a conditional entrant under 8 U.S.C. 1153;
(iii) Admitted as a refugee under 8 U.S.C. 1157; or
(iv) Granted asylum under 8 U.S.C. 1158;
(b) Is an Afghan special immigrant, pursuant to P.L. 110-161, who has
special immigration status after December 26, 2007; or
(c) Is an Iraqi special immigrant, pursuant to P.L. 110-181, who has
special immigration status after January 28, 2008.
(2) A person whose status is Cuban/Haitian entrant shall be determined
pursuant to 45 CFR 401.


(3) An Amerasian or close family member admitted as an immigrant but el-
igible for refugee medical assistance as though such person was admitted as a
refugee must have either of the following documents verifying such person's
status:
(a) An I-94 coded AM1, AM2, or AM3, stamped "processed for I-551. Tem-
porary evidence of lawful admission for permanent residence. Valid
until (expiration date). Employment authorized." and containing the
stamped word "admitted" on the back; or
(b) A permanent identification document, form I-551, coded AM6, AM7, or
AM8.
56-504. LIMITATION ON BENEFITS. (1) Medical assistance under the
refugee medical assistance program is determined under 45 CFR 400.211.
(2) A person with refugee status whose countable income does not exceed
one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty guidelines is
eligible for refugee medical assistance. A person with refugee status whose
income exceeds such threshold may subtract his medical costs from his income
and spend down to the FPG limit for his family size.
(3) Income is counted or excluded in accordance with medicaid program
rules except that the following are excluded from income when determining
eligibility:
(a) Refugee cash assistance; and
(b) The income of sponsors and the in-kind services and shelter pro-
vided to refugees by their sponsors.
SECTION 2. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.03.06, Department of Health
and Welfare, relating to Refugee Medical Assistance, shall be null, void and
of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.